Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-1203
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Sex Offender Commitment Act:

(1) The definitions found in sections 71-904.02, 71-904.03, 71-905, 71-906, 71-907, 71-910, 71-911, 71-914.01, 71-914.02, 71-914.03, and 83-174.01 apply;

(2) Administrator means the administrator or other chief administrative officer of a treatment facility, medical facility, jail, or Department of Correctional Services facility or his or her designee;

(3) Outpatient treatment means treatment ordered by a mental health board directing a subject to comply with specified outpatient treatment requirements, including, but not limited to, (a) taking prescribed medication, (b) reporting to a mental health professional or treatment facility for treatment or for monitoring of the subject's condition, or (c) participating in individual or group therapy or educational, rehabilitation, residential, or vocational programs;

(4)(a) Subject means any person concerning whom (i) a certificate has been filed under section 71-1204, (ii) a certificate has been filed under section 71-919 and such person is held pursuant to subdivision (2)(c) of section 71-919, or (iii) a petition has been filed under the Sex Offender Commitment Act.

(b) Subject also includes a person who is a member of a tribe or eligible for membership in a tribe, who is domiciled within Indian country in Nebraska, and concerning whom sex offender involuntary commitment or emergency protective custody proceedings have been initiated under tribal law.

(c) Subject does not include any person under eighteen years of age unless such person is an emancipated minor; and

(5) Treatment facility means a facility which provides services for persons who are dangerous sex offenders.

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 59;

Laws 2024, LB1288, § 25;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 121;

Laws 2026, LB816, § 6.
April 8, 2026
The explicit purpose of the Sex Offender Commitment Act is to protect the public from sex offenders who continue to pose a threat of harm to others. In re Interest of J.R., 277 Neb. 362, 762 N.W.2d 305 (2009).